Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13001 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, "agency" means any agency, board,
commission, department, or other state government entity created
pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Constitution or the
Oklahoma Statutes.

BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.
HB1219 HFLR Page 1

B. No funds may be used by any agency to develop, organize,
administer, engage in, promote, or endorse any activity, including
any event, initiative, official communication, social media post,
educational program, or public campaign, that aims to promote or
recognize Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, Queer, and Intersex
Pride Month or any event with a similar theme.
C. Only flags pursuant to federal and state law may be
displayed by an agency on state property or grounds.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
03/10/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.









BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.
HB1219 HFLR Page 2